Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4076.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7129. (1) If a food is subject to a standard established under this chapter, it shall must be identified by the name required by that standard. If no standard applies, the product shall must be identified by its the product's common or usual name. If no common or usual name exists, the product shall must be identified by an appropriately descriptive name that is not misleading and that accurately identifies or describes, in as simple and direct terms as possible, the basic nature of the food and its the product's characterizing ingredients or properties. A product manufactured or sold under the provisions of this act , which that is sold in closed or sealed packages shall must bear a complete label. The label shall must bear the all of the following: (a) The true name of the product as defined in this act. , an (b) An ingredient statement if the product contains more than 1 ingredient. , the (c) The net weight of the product. , and the (d) The name and address of the manufacturer. (2) Products A product sold from a bulk retail displays shall display must bear a sign or placard containing that contains the true and approved name of the product. If the product contains more than 1 ingredient, an ingredient statement shall must be placarded, posted, or otherwise available for the customer in written form. (3) Meat products A meat product using antioxidants shall must indicate on the label, or, in the absence of a label, an adjacent placard, their the presence and purpose of the antioxidants in the meat product. (4) Meat products containing A meat product that contains monosodium glutamate, hydrolyzed vegetable protein, or any other source of monosodium glutamate shall must indicate on the label, or, in the absence of a label, an adjacent placard, in its presence.the presence of those substances in the meat product. (5) The meat ingredients in a meat product that specifies 1 type of meat in its name, such as including, but not limited to, ham loaf, pork loaf, veal patties, or turkey sausage, shall must be entirely from the species indicated in the product name. The meat in a meat product that specifies more than 1 type of meat in its name, such as including, but not limited to, beef and turkey sausage, shall must be entirely from the types of meat indicated, and shall must contain at least 20% of each meat. A meat product that contains a type of meat consisting of less than 20% of that meat may be labeled as "(product) _____ added" or "product with _____", inserting the common name of that meat. Sausage labeled or advertised as all meat or all beef shall must not contain any nonfat dry milk solids or dry whole milk. (6) A person shall not label or identify as meat a laboratory-grown meat substitute. A person that sells a laboratory-grown meat substitute shall include on the label 1 or more of the following terms: (a) Cell-cultured. (b) Lab-grown. (c) Cultivated. (d) Cell-cultivated. (e) Another similar, accurate qualifying term or disclaimer intended to clearly communicate to a consumer the contents of the product. (7) (6) All required words and numbers shall must be legible to potential customers.